Hawaii statutes.
LEGAL
INCIDENTS OF REGISTERED LAND

§501-81 Legal incidents of registered land.
Registered land, and ownership therein, shall in all respects be subject to the
same burdens and incidents which attach by law to unregistered land. Nothing
in this chapter shall in any way be construed to relieve registered land or the
owners thereof from any rights incident to the relation of husband and wife; or
from liability to attachment or mesne process or levy on execution; or from
liability to any lien of any description established by law on land and the
buildings thereon, or in the interest of the owner in land or buildings; or to
change the laws of descent except as provided in section 501-71; or the rights
of partition between coparceners and other cotenants; or the right to take the
same by eminent domain; or to relieve such land from liability to be recovered
by a trustee in bankruptcy under the provisions of law relating to preferences;
or to change or affect in any way any other rights or liabilities created by
law and applicable to unregistered land; except as otherwise expressly provided
in this chapter. [L 1903, c 56, §70; RL 1925, §3259; RL 1935, §5040; RL 1945,
§12640; RL 1955, §342-41; HRS §501-81; am L 1972, c 91, §1(p)]

Case Notes

Civil rights action involving courts' relocation of seaward
boundary of registered land. 402 F. Supp. 95.

Easements of ingress and egress, creation of by subdivision
map filed in land court. 34 H. 881; 39 H. 608. See 37 H. 270. Dedication of
streets. 39 H. 514.

Rights incident to relation of husband and wife affect
registered land as well as unregistered. 35 H. 816, 825.

Registered land, like unregistered land, is subject to
erosion. 55 H. 176, 517 P.2d 57.

Referred to: 44 H. 235, 246, 353 P.2d 1007; 50 H. 189, 436
P.2d 207.

Mentioned: 130 H. 183 (App.), 307 P.3d 163 (2013).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next